District of Columbia statutes.
10-1203.07

Collection and transfer of taxes to Washington Convention Center Fund.

(a)

Notwithstanding any other law, surtaxes and dedicated taxes shall be collected by the Mayor, pursuant to §§ 47-1807.02(a)(4), 47-1807.02a, 47-1808.03(a)(4), 47-1808.03a [repealed], 47-2002.02, 47-2002.03, 47-2202.01, 47-2202.02, the provisions of which are incorporated by reference in this section, and transferred to the Washington Convention Center Fund for the purposes set forth in § 10-1202.08 until any of these provisions are repealed by legislation enacted after September 27, 1996.

(b)

This section shall apply as of September 27, 1996.

History

Sept. 28, 1994, D.C. Law 10-188, § 307
as added Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-264, § 21, 46 DCR 2118
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 2081(r), 57 DCR 181

Section References

This section is referenced in § 10-1601.02 and § 47-2002.05.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 9-833.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 18-111, in the section heading and subsec. (a), deleted “Authority” following “Center”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2081(r) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2081(r) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).